Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.308

Global Asia institute.

(1) A global Asia institute is created within the Henry M. Jackson School of International Studies. The mission of the institute is to promote the understanding of Asia and its interactions with Washington state and the world. The institute shall host visiting scholars and policymakers, sponsor programs and learning initiatives, engage in collaborative research projects, and facilitate broader understanding and cooperation between the state of Washington and Asia through general public programs and targeted collaborations with specific communities in the state.

(2) Within existing resources, a global Asia institute advisory board is established. The director of the Henry M. Jackson School of International Studies shall appoint members of the advisory board and determine the advisory board's roles and responsibilities. The board shall include members representing academia, business, and government.

[ 2012 c 229 s 806; 2009 c 466 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Findings—Intent—2009 c 466: "The legislature finds that Asia and its interactions with the rest of the world are transforming the way the world works in the twenty-first century. The legislature further finds that trade, finance, technology, and global influence and institutions are all areas in which China, India, and other Asian states are in the process of reshaping the nature of the international system, and that Washington state is uniquely situated to contribute to enhance interactions between the United States and Asia. The legislature intends to establish a global Asia institute at the University of Washington." [ 2009 c 466 s 1.]